Idaho, session 2026, H0514.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 54-5810, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-5810. QUALIFICATIONS FOR LICENSURE -- INSTRUCTORS -- APPRENTICES
-- STUDENTS. (1) To qualify for licensure under this chapter, an applicant
for licensure must:
(a) Be at least sixteen and one-half (16 1/2) years of age at the time of
application;
(b) Have completed at least two (2) years of high school or have at-
tained an equivalent education as determined by the board;
(c) Pass an examination for the occupation in which the applicant is
seeking licensure, which examination shall be conducted or approved by
the board; and
(d) Prove to the satisfaction of the board that the applicant has not
engaged in conduct that would constitute grounds for discipline under
section 54-5823, Idaho Code.
(2) Except as otherwise provided, and in addition to the requirements
listed in subsection (1) of this section, an applicant for licensure:
(a) As a barber, must have:
(i) Completed and graduated from a course of instruction of at
least nine hundred (900) hours in a barber school approved by the
board; or
(ii) Completed at least one thousand eight hundred (1,800) hours
as an apprentice in an apprenticeship that covered all aspects of
the practice of barbering;
(b) As a barber-stylist, must have:
(i) Completed and graduated from a course of instruction of at
least one thousand five hundred (1,500) hours in a barber school
approved by the board; or
(ii) Completed at least three thousand (3,000) hours as an appren-
tice in an apprenticeship that covered all aspects of the practice
of barber-styling;
(c) As a cosmetologist, must have:
(i) Completed and graduated from a course of instruction of at
least one thousand six hundred (1,600) hours in a cosmetology
school approved by the board; or


(ii) Completed at least three thousand two hundred (3,200) hours
as an apprentice in an apprenticeship that covered all aspects of
the practice of cosmetology;
(d) As an electrologist, must have:
(i) Completed and graduated from a course of instruction of at
least six hundred (600) hours in a school approved by the board; or
(ii) Completed at least one thousand two hundred (1,200) hours as
an apprentice in a cosmetology establishment under the direct per-
sonal supervision of a licensed electrologist instructor;
(e) As an esthetician, must have:
(i) Completed and graduated from a course of instruction of at
least six hundred (600) hours in a school approved by the board; or
(ii) Completed at least one thousand two hundred (1,200) hours
as an apprentice in a cosmetology establishment under the direct
personal supervision of a licensed cosmetology instructor. Such
establishment must have at least one (1) licensed esthetician
on-site in accordance with board rules; and
(f) As a nail technician, must have:
(i) Completed and graduated from a course of instruction of at
least four hundred (400) hours in a school approved by the board;
or
(ii) Completed at least eight hundred (800) hours as an apprentice
in a cosmetology establishment under the direct personal super-
vision of a licensed cosmetology instructor. Such establishment
shall have at least one (1) licensed nail technician on-site in ac-
cordance with board rules.
(3) To qualify as an instructor of barbering, barber-styling, cosme-
tology, electrology, esthetics, or nail technology, an applicant must:
(a) Hold a current license in the profession or closely related profes-
sion, as determined by the board, for which the applicant seeks to in-
struct;
(b) Have worked for at least five (5) of the last seven (7) years as a li-
censed barber, barber-stylist, cosmetologist, electrologist, estheti-
cian, or nail technician, or have satisfactorily completed:
(i) A minimum six (6) month teacher's course of instruction in one
(1) of the specialties described in this subsection; or
(ii) A minimum three (3) month teacher's course of instruction in
a school of one (1) of the specialties described in this subsec-
tion, if the applicant has at least two (2) years of experience as
a licensee in one (1) of the specialties described in this subsec-
tion; and
(c) Have completed twelve (12) college credit hours or equivalent edu-
cation, as determined by the board, or pass an examination approved by
the board.
(4) To be qualified to hold an apprenticeship for purposes of this chap-
ter, a person must:
(a) Meet the qualifications set forth in paragraphs (a), (b), and (d) of
subsection (1) of this section; and
(b) Be registered as an apprentice with the board.


(5) To be considered a student for purposes of this chapter, a person
must:
(a) Meet the qualifications set forth in paragraph (b) of subsection
(1) of this section; and
(b) Be registered as a student in a licensed barber school or cosmetol-
ogy school.
(6) A student shall be permitted to take an examination required pur-
suant to subsection (1) of this section after such student has completed
eighty percent (80%) of the education hours required pursuant to subsection
(2) of this section.
(6) (7) A high school student enrolled in a licensed school may be under
sixteen and one-half (16 1/2) years of age while accruing the course of in-
struction hours required for licensure.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.